Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.250

Violation—Restitution assessed by director.

The director may assess against a person or organization that violates this chapter, or a rule adopted under this chapter, the full amount of restitution as may be necessary to restore to a person an interest in money or property, real or personal, that may have been acquired by means of an act prohibited by or in violation of this chapter.

[ 1994 c 237 s 22.]